Utah statutes.
4-11-8.   County bee inspector -- Disinfection required before leaving apiary with diseased bees.

(1)  Before leaving the premises of any apiary where disease exists, the county bee inspector, or any assistant, shall thoroughly disinfect any part of the inspector's own person, clothing, or any appliance that has come in contact with infected material.

(2)  The method of disinfection required by Subsection (1):

(a)  may be determined by the department; and

(b)  shall be sufficient to destroy disease, parasites, and pathogens encountered.

(3)  A county bee inspector shall maintain a record of each inspection, including disinfection practices.

(4)  The county executive or the commissioner may review a county bee inspector's records kept in accordance with Subsection (3).

